Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-300 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Emergency Weather Response and Tracking Regulatory Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-301 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma Emergency Weather Response and Tracking
Regulatory Act of 2025:
1. "Professional Severe Weather Tracker" shall mean a licensed
individual or company hired or contracted via a qualified media
outlet, or is affiliated with a research program at a qualified
institution for higher education;
2. "Qualified institution for higher education" shall mean any
college or university regulated by the Oklahoma State Regents for
HB2426 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

High er Education who offers a course or program in meteorology,
including federal or state research programs in the field of severe
weather, which shall include vehicles gathering atmospheric
conditions and radar vehicles;
3. "Qualified media outlet" shall mean a commercial television
or radio station licensed by the Federal Communication Commission
for the broadcast or transmission of television programming via
broadcast, cable, streaming, or other platforms as recognized by the
Federal Communications Commission; and
4. "Significant weather event" shall mean:
a. tornado or severe thunderstorm warning that partially
or wholly covers one or more counties located in the
State of Oklahoma issued by the National Weather
Service,
b. tornado or severe thunderstorm warned storms that are
located in any county within a neighboring state in
which that county borders the State of Oklahoma,
c. red flag fire warning issued by the National Weather
Service or the Oklahoma Forestry Services of the
Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and
Forestry, or
d. flash flood warning or flood warning issued by the
National Weather Service or the chief meteorologist
employed by a qualified media outlet.
HB2426 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-302 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to create a
Professional Severe Weather Tracker license.
B. Any Professional Severe Weather Tracker employed or
contracted with by any qualified media outlet shall be eligible to
apply for a license authorized in this subsection. Such licensee
shall:
1. Cause a copy of his or her license issued by Service
Oklahoma to be kept on file with such outlet;
2. Cause to be displayed in sharp contrasting colors visible
from fifty (50) feet, in conformance with the rules of Service
Oklahoma, on both sides of every primary vehicle utilized by the
Professional Severe Weather Tracker, his or her license number
issued by Service Oklahoma and the Federal Communications Commission
license number of the qualified media outlet with whom the tracker
maintains the employment or contractual relationship;
3. Shall have been employed or contracted with a qualified
media outlet no less than one (1) year and shall not have been
terminated for cause by a qualified media outlet in the last four
(4) years;


HB2426 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. Submit to an electronic national criminal history record
check pursuant to Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
5. Supply Service Oklahoma with a letter from the hiring entity
of the qualified media outlet stating the belief of such hiring
entity that the prospective Professional Severe Weather Tracker
possesses the knowledge, experience, and training to exercise the
powers and duties of the license responsibly;
6. Provide a copy of valid and continuing insurance coverage
for the vehicle to Service Oklahoma;
7. Take an emergency driving course provided by an institute of
higher education or a private driving school before receiving a
license and upon every renewal; and
8. Carry minimum vehicle insurance of One Million Dollars
($1,000,000.00) of combined single liability.
C. Any Professional Severe Weather Tracker employed, contracted
with, or otherwise affiliated with any qualified institution for
higher education shall be eligible to apply for a license authorized
in this subsection. Such licensee shall:
1. Cause a copy of his or her license issued by Service
Oklahoma to be kept on file with the dean, director, or other
designated individual by the institution who shall be responsible
for the maintenance of records associated with the institution's
meteorology program;
HB2426 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Cause to be displayed in sharp contrasting colors visible
from fifty (50) feet, in conformance with the rules of Service
Oklahoma, on both sides of every primary vehicle utilized by the
Professional Severe Weather Tracker, the license number as issued by
Service Oklahoma, as well as an identifying number developed by
Service Oklahoma for qualified institutions of higher education;
3. Submit to an electronic national criminal history record
check pursuant to Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
4. Supply Service Oklahoma with a letter from the dean,
director, or other designated individual by the institution who
shall be responsible for the maintenance of records associated with
the institution's meteorology program stating the belief of such
person that the prospective Professional Severe Weather Tracker
possesses the knowledge, experience, and training to exercise the
powers and duties of the license responsibly;
5. Provide a copy of valid and continuing insurance coverage
for the vehicle to Service Oklahoma;
6. Take an emergency driving course provided by an institute of
higher education or a private driving school before receiving a
license and upon every renewal; and
7. Carry minimum vehicle insurance of One Million Dollars
($1,000,000.00) of combined single liability.

HB2426 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. The fees for a license issued pursuant to this section shall
be sufficient to only cover the costs of the implementation and
administration of this act, however under no circumstances shall the
fee authorized in this subsection exceed Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) for a three-year license for the initial application and
shall expire at the end of the calendar year of the third year. The
fee for any subsequent renewal shall be Two Hundred Fifty Dollars
($250.00) for any subsequent renewal.
E. Service Oklahoma shall issue a letter of reprimand, cancel,
suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license of an
operator when it finds the licensee or applicant has not complied
with or has violated any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Emergency
Weather Response and Tracking Act of 2025, or any rules adopted by
Service Oklahoma. A suspension or revocation shall be for a period
of time deemed appropriate by Service Oklahoma for the violation.
Any canceled, suspended, or revoked license shall be returned to
Service Oklahoma by the licensee, and the licensee shall not be
eligible to apply for another license until the period of suspension
or revocation has elapsed.
F. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules to effectuate the
provisions of this act.
G. The provisions of the Oklahoma Administrative Procedures Act
shall apply to the implementation and administration of this act.

HB2426 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-303 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for Service Oklahoma to be designated the "Severe Weather Tracker
Licensure Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations. All monies accruing to the credit of
the fund are hereby appropriated and shall be budgeted and expended
by Service Oklahoma for the restricted purposes of the monies as
prescribed by law. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-304 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Primary vehicles utilized by a professional severe weather
tracker shall:
1. Display markings clearly identifying such vehicle as being
utilized for severe weather tracking and identifying the qualified
media outlet or qualified institution of higher education with which
the tracker is affiliated; and


HB2426 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Be authorized to be equipped with and to use the visual
signals described in Section 12-218 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
B. Once the conditions of a significant weather event have been
met, a professional severe weather tracker may:
1. Activate the visual signals authorized for use in this act;
2. Be considered an authorized emergency vehicle for the
purposes of this act;
3. Travel upon roads, highways, and county roads closed by the
Department of Transportation, the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority, any
city or county, or any law enforcement agency by reason of
conditions triggered by the significant weather event;
4. Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only
after slowing down as may be necessary for safe operation;
5. Exceed the maximum speed limits so long as speeding does not
endanger life or property;
6. Disregard regulations governing direction of movement; and
7. Disregard regulations governing turning in specified
directions.
C. The exemptions granted to a professional severe weather
tracker in this section shall apply only when the tracker is
properly and lawfully making use of flashing green and yellow lights
or a combination of flashing green and yellow lights meeting the
requirements of Section 12-218 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
HB2426 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. The provisions of this section shall not limit the liability
of a professional severe weather tracker. The provisions of this
section shall not relieve the professional severe weather tracker
from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all
persons, nor shall such provisions protect the driver from the
consequences of reckless disregard for the safety of others.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a
professional severe weather tracker from obligation to yield right-
of-way and stop for superseding authorized emergency vehicles, as
prescribed in Section 1-103 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-305 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any Professional Severe Weather Tracker found to be in violation
of the provisions of this act shall be subject to a fine, not to
exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and revocation of his or her
license by Service Oklahoma.
Such fine or revocation shall be in addition to any criminal or
civil penalties that the Professional Severe Weather Tracker may be
subject to for any other violations of the laws of this state.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-306 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

HB2426 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit or limit the
rights of any individual from engaging in recreational or commercial
storm chasing who is not in possession of or eligible to receive a
license authorized by this act. However, a license received
pursuant to this act shall not be used for the purpose of getting a
better filming location. The license shall only be used for the
purposes of keeping up with a storm or its conditions and traveling
through restricted locations, not to restricted locations.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-103. Authorized emergency vehicles - Equipment.
A. When equipped as prescribed in subsection B of this section:
1. Vehicles of fire departments;
2. Ambulances or vehicles specified pursuant to subsection B of
Section 1-2512 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes of licensed
ambulance service providers;
3. State vehicles of law enforcement agencies;
4. County vehicles of sheriffs and full-time commissioned
deputies and vehicles designated by the sheriff for support of the
sheriff's office including privately owned vehicles driven by the
sheriff and full-time, part-time and reserve commissioned deputies;
provided the audible sirens and flashing red lights equipped on such
privately owned vehicles are used only in a law enforcement capacity
and in the course of duty;
HB2426 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. Municipal vehicles of police departments;
6. Vehicles owned and operated by the United States Marshals
Service or the Federal Bureau of Investigation;
7. Vehicles of Oklahoma National Guard units designated by the
Adjutant General for support to civil authorities; or
8. Vehicles owned and operated by any local organization for
emergency management as defined by Section 683.3 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; or
9. Primary vehicles of professional severe weather trackers
hired by or contracted with a qualified media outlet or qualified
institution of higher education, as those terms are defined in
Section 2 of this act. Provided, however, such authorized emergency
vehicle designation shall only be provided while the professional
severe weather tracker is tracking a significant weather event, and
professional severe weather trackers shall yield right-of-way and
stop for vehicles described in paragraphs 1 through 8 of this
subsection,
are authorized emergency vehicles.
B. All Except for primary vehicles of professional severe
weather trackers, all vehicles prescribed in subsection A of this
section shall be equipped with sirens capable of giving audible
signals as required by the provisions of Section 12-218 of this
title and flashing red lights as authorized by the provisions of
Section 12-218 of this title.
HB2426 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 12-218, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 12-218. A. Every authorized emergency vehicle shall,
in addition to any other equipment and distinctive markings required
by this title, be equipped with flashing red or blue lights or a
combination of flashing red and blue lights. The lights shall be
visible at five hundred (500) feet in normal sunlight.
B. A law enforcement vehicle when used as an authorized
emergency vehicle may but need not be equipped with alternately-
flashing red or blue lights specified herein. An unmarked vehicle
used as a law enforcement vehicle for routine traffic enforcement
shall be equipped with the following combination of lights:
1. Three flashing red, blue, or a combination of red and blue
lights emitting the flashing lights to the front of the vehicle;
2. Two flashing white lights emitting the flashing white lights
to the front of the vehicle;
3. Flashing red, blue, white or any combination of red, blue or
white lights placed at and emitting the flashing lights from the
four corners of the vehicle so that they are visible for three
hundred sixty (360) degrees; and
4. One flashing red, blue, amber, or any combination of red,
blue, or amber lights emitting the flashing light to the rear of the
vehicle.

HB2426 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

C. A professional severe weather tracker hired by or contracted
with a qualified media outlet or qualified institution of higher
education, as such terms are defined in Section 2 of this act, shall
be equipped with a combination of green and yellow flashing lights.
The lights shall be visible at five hundred (500) feet in normal
sunlight.
D. The use of the signal equipment described herein shall
impose upon drivers of other vehicles the obligation to yield right-
of-way and stop for authorized emergency vehicles, as prescribed in
Section 11-405 of this title.
SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.











HB2426 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.